Hawaii statutes.
[§27-6] Extended state information and
services provided. The office of the governor shall receive and review
requests from state agencies for providing information and services to the
public. Upon determination of needed extension services, the office shall
solicit the aid and cooperation of the counties. Joint efforts will be made to
use existing state and county facilities, and to create new facilities if
necessary. [L 1975, c 150, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next